Tennessee, session 114, SB2596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-185(c)(1), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (c)(1)(A) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (B):
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1)(A), the speed limit restriction of forty-five
miles per hour (45 mph) or less for state highways and county roads does not apply to a
utility terrain vehicle being operated for agricultural purposes; provided, that the
restrictions described in subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) continue to apply.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2596
012484
- 1 -